Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-778
Basic coverage for treatment of alcoholism, defined.

Basic coverage for treatment of alcoholism shall mean coverage for primary and outpatient treatment consisting of not less than (1) thirty days of inpatient coverage for the primary treatment of alcoholism in any three-hundred-sixty-five-day benefit period with at least two such inpatient treatment periods available during the lifetime of the policy, and (2) sixty outpatient treatment visits during the lifetime of the policy.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 10.